test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-dadzha_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - dadžā: # Noun 49 'eng /est ohakas/fin' - full paradigm
     dadžā+N+Sg+Nom: dadžā
     dadžā+N+Sg+Gen: dadžā
     dadžā+N+Sg+Par: [daʼdžõ, dadžõ]
     dadžā+N+Sg+Dat: dadžān
     dadžā+N+Sg+Ins: dadžāks
     dadžā+N+Sg+Ill: [daʼdžõ, dadžõ]
     dadžā+N+Sg+Ela: dadžāst
     dadžā+N+Pl+Nom: dadžād
     dadžā+N+Pl+Gen: dadžād
     dadžā+N+Pl+Par: dadžīdi
     dadžā+N+Pl+Dat: dadžādõn
     dadžā+N+Pl+Ins: dadžādõks
     dadžā+N+Pl+Ill: dadžīz
     dadžā+N+Pl+Ela: dadžīst
